Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2078
Injury data; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that the cost of injury and the deaths associated with injury are of a vital concern to the health of the residents of the State of Nebraska. The Legislature further finds that the availability of reliable injury data is necessary in order to provide for the protection and promotion of the health of the residents of the state. It is the intent of the Legislature to assist in and encourage injury prevention by requiring that specific data relating to injuries be available to health care professionals and analysts in order that such data be utilized for research, analytical, and statistical purposes.

Laws 1993, LB 387, § 1.